Hawaii, session 2025, HB449.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the INNOVATE Hawaii program has been a federal program of the Hawaii technology development corporation for over twenty years and is funded by the National Institute of Standards and Technology  manufacturing extension program, with a mission of supporting the reshoring of manufacturing United States federal initiatives while providing funding and technology to each local manufacturing extension program center in each state. INNOVATE Hawaii is part of a network of fifty-two manufacturing extension program centers supporting local manufacturers in each state.  The legislature further finds that funding for INNOVATE Hawaii would be used to bring new, advanced technology to the State to assist small businesses with development, manufacturing, operations, and marketing of "Made in Hawaii" products. Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to promote economic development by appropriating funds for assisting in the development and promotion of Hawaii-manufactured products through the INNOVATE Hawaii program. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for assisting in the development and promotion of Hawaii-manufactured products through the INNOVATE Hawaii program. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii technology development corporation for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.